Illinois, session 104th, HB1785.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5changing Section 5-5.2 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/5-5.2)7    Sec. 5-5.2. Payment. 8    (a) All nursing facilities that are grouped pursuant to 9Section 5-5.1 of this Act shall receive the same rate of 10payment for similar services.11    (b) It shall be a matter of State policy that the Illinois 12Department shall utilize a uniform billing cycle throughout 13the State for the long-term care providers.14    (c) (Blank). 15    (c-1) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Code, 16the methodologies for reimbursement of nursing services as 17provided under this Article shall no longer be applicable for 18bills payable for nursing services rendered on or after a new 19reimbursement system based on the Patient Driven Payment Model 20(PDPM) has been fully operationalized, which shall take effect 21for services provided on or after the implementation of the 22PDPM reimbursement system begins. For the purposes of Public 23Act 102-1035, the implementation date of the PDPM   HB1785- 2 -LRB104 09236 KTG 19293 b1reimbursement system and all related provisions shall be July 21, 2022 if the following conditions are met: (i) the Centers 3for Medicare and Medicaid Services has approved corresponding 4changes in the reimbursement system and bed assessment; and 5(ii) the Department has filed rules to implement these changes 6no later than June 1, 2022. Failure of the Department to file 7rules to implement the changes provided in Public Act 102-1035 8no later than June 1, 2022 shall result in the implementation 9date being delayed to October 1, 2022. 10    (d) The new nursing services reimbursement methodology 11utilizing the Patient Driven Payment Model, which shall be 12referred to as the PDPM reimbursement system, taking effect 13July 1, 2022, upon federal approval by the Centers for 14Medicare and Medicaid Services, shall be based on the 15following: 16        (1) The methodology shall be resident-centered, 17    facility-specific, cost-based, and based on guidance from 18    the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. 19        (2) Costs shall be annually rebased and case mix index 20    quarterly updated. The nursing services methodology will 21    be assigned to the Medicaid enrolled residents on record 22    as of 30 days prior to the beginning of the rate period in 23    the Department's Medicaid Management Information System 24    (MMIS) as present on the last day of the second quarter 25    preceding the rate period based upon the Assessment 26    Reference Date of the Minimum Data Set (MDS).   HB1785- 3 -LRB104 09236 KTG 19293 b1        (3) Regional wage adjustors based on the Health 2    Service Areas (HSA) groupings and adjusters in effect on 3    April 30, 2012 shall be included, except no adjuster shall 4    be lower than 1.06. 5        (4) PDPM nursing case mix indices in effect on March 6    1, 2022 shall be assigned to each resident class at no less 7    than 0.7858 of the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid 8    Services PDPM unadjusted case mix values, in effect on 9    March 1, 2022.10        (5) The pool of funds available for distribution by 11    case mix and the base facility rate shall be determined 12    using the formula contained in subsection (d-1). 13        (6) The Department shall establish a variable per diem 14    staffing add-on in accordance with the most recent 15    available federal staffing report, currently the Payroll 16    Based Journal, for the same period of time, and if 17    applicable adjusted for acuity using the same quarter's 18    MDS. The Department shall rely on Payroll Based Journals 19    provided to the Department of Public Health to make a 20    determination of non-submission. If the Department is 21    notified by a facility of missing or inaccurate Payroll 22    Based Journal data or an incorrect calculation of 23    staffing, the Department must make a correction as soon as 24    the error is verified for the applicable quarter.25        Beginning October 1, 2024, the staffing percentage 26    used in the calculation of the per diem staffing add-on   HB1785- 4 -LRB104 09236 KTG 19293 b1    shall be its PDPM STRIVE Staffing Ratio which equals: its 2    Reported Total Nurse Staffing Hours Per Resident Per Day 3    as published in the most recent federal staffing report 4    (the Provider Information File), divided by the facility's 5    PDPM STRIVE Staffing Target. Each facility's PDPM STRIVE 6    Staffing Target is equal to .82 times the facility's 7    Illinois Adjusted Facility Case-Mix Hours Per Resident Per 8    Day. A facility's Illinois Adjusted Facility Case Mix 9    Hours Per Resident Per Day is equal to its Case-Mix Total 10    Nurse Staffing Hours Per Resident Per Day (as published in 11    the most recent federal Provider Information file staffing 12    report) times 3.662 (which reflects the national resident 13    days-weighted mean Reported Total Nurse Staffing Hours Per 14    Resident Per Day as calculated using the January 2024 15    federal Provider Information Files), divided by the 16    national resident days-weighted mean Reported Total Nurse 17    Staffing Hours Per Resident Per Day calculated using the 18    most recent State US Averages file federal Provider 19    Information File.20        Beginning July 1, 2025, the staffing percentage used 21    in the calculation of the per diem staffing add-on shall 22    be its PDPM STRIVE Staffing Ratio which equals: its 23    Reported Total Nurse Staffing Hours Per Resident Per Day 24    as published in the most recent federal staffing report 25    (the Provider Information file), divided by the facility's 26    PDPM STRIVE Staffing Target. Each facility's PDPM STRIVE   HB1785- 5 -LRB104 09236 KTG 19293 b1    Staffing Target is equal to .76 times the facility's 2    Illinois Adjusted Facility Case-Mix Hours Per Resident Per 3    Day. A facility's Illinois Adjusted Facility Case-Mix 4    Hours Per Resident Per Day is equal to its Nursing 5    Case-Mix (as published in the most recent federal Provider 6    Information file) divided by 1.4627 times 3.79 (which is 7    the Reported Total Nurse Staffing Hours Per Resident Per 8    Day for the Nation as reported in the January 2024 State US 9    Averages file). 10        (6.5) Beginning July 1, 2024, the paid per diem 11    staffing add-on shall be the paid per diem staffing add-on 12    in effect April 1, 2024. For dates beginning October 1, 13    2024 and through September 30, 2025, the denominator for 14    the staffing percentage shall be the lesser of the 15    facility's PDPM STRIVE Staffing Target and:16            (A) For the quarter beginning October 1, 2024, the 17        sum of 20% of the facility's PDPM STRIVE Staffing 18        Target and 80% of the facility's Case-Mix Total Nurse 19        Staffing Hours Per Resident Per Day (as published in 20        the January 2024 federal staffing report).21            (B) For the quarter beginning January 1, 2025, the 22        sum of 40% of the facility's PDPM STRIVE Staffing 23        Target and 60% of the facility's Case-Mix Total Nurse 24        Staffing Hours Per Resident Per Day (as published in 25        the January 2024 federal staffing report).26            (C) For the quarter beginning March 1, 2025, the   HB1785- 6 -LRB104 09236 KTG 19293 b1        sum of 60% of the facility's PDPM STRIVE Staffing 2        Target and 40% of the facility's Case-Mix Total Nurse 3        Staffing Hours Per Resident Per Day (as published in 4        the January 2024 federal staffing report).5            (D) For the quarter beginning July 1, 2025, the 6        sum of 80% of the facility's PDPM STRIVE Staffing 7        Target and 20% of the facility's Case-Mix Total Nurse 8        Staffing Hours Per Resident Per Day (as published in 9        the January 2024 federal staffing report). 10         Facilities with at least 70% of the staffing 11    indicated by the STRIVE study shall be paid a per diem 12    add-on of $9, increasing by equivalent steps for each 13    whole percentage point until the facilities reach a per 14    diem of $16.52. Facilities with at least 80% of the 15    staffing indicated by the STRIVE study shall be paid a per 16    diem add-on of $16.52, increasing by equivalent steps for 17    each whole percentage point until the facilities reach a 18    per diem add-on of $25.77. Facilities with at least 92% of 19    the staffing indicated by the STRIVE study shall be paid a 20    per diem add-on of $25.77, increasing by equivalent steps 21    for each whole percentage point until the facilities reach 22    a per diem add-on of $30.98. Facilities with at least 100% 23    of the staffing indicated by the STRIVE study shall be 24    paid a per diem add-on of $30.98, increasing by equivalent 25    steps for each whole percentage point until the facilities 26    reach a per diem add-on of $36.44. Facilities with at   HB1785- 7 -LRB104 09236 KTG 19293 b1    least 110% of the staffing indicated by the STRIVE study 2    shall be paid a per diem add-on of $36.44, increasing by 3    equivalent steps for each whole percentage point until the 4    facilities reach a per diem add-on of $38.68. Facilities 5    with at least 125% or higher of the staffing indicated by 6    the STRIVE study shall be paid a per diem add-on of $38.68. 7    No nursing facility's variable staffing per diem add-on 8    shall be reduced by more than 5% in 2 consecutive 9    quarters. For the quarters beginning July 1, 2022 and 10    October 1, 2022, no facility's variable per diem staffing 11    add-on shall be calculated at a rate lower than 85% of the 12    staffing indicated by the STRIVE study. No facility below 13    70% of the staffing indicated by the STRIVE study shall 14    receive a variable per diem staffing add-on after December 15    31, 2022. 16        (7) For dates of services beginning July 1, 2022, the 17    PDPM nursing component per diem for each nursing facility 18    shall be the product of the facility's (i) statewide PDPM 19    nursing base per diem rate, $92.25, adjusted for the 20    facility average PDPM case mix index calculated quarterly 21    and (ii) the regional wage adjuster, and then add the 22    Medicaid access adjustment as defined in (e-3) of this 23    Section. Transition rates for services provided between 24    July 1, 2022 and October 1, 2023 shall be the greater of 25    the PDPM nursing component per diem or: 26            (A) for the quarter beginning July 1, 2022, the   HB1785- 8 -LRB104 09236 KTG 19293 b1        RUG-IV nursing component per diem;2            (B) for the quarter beginning October 1, 2022, the 3        sum of the RUG-IV nursing component per diem 4        multiplied by 0.80 and the PDPM nursing component per 5        diem multiplied by 0.20;6            (C) for the quarter beginning January 1, 2023, the 7        sum of the RUG-IV nursing component per diem 8        multiplied by 0.60 and the PDPM nursing component per 9        diem multiplied by 0.40;10            (D) for the quarter beginning April 1, 2023, the 11        sum of the RUG-IV nursing component per diem 12        multiplied by 0.40 and the PDPM nursing component per 13        diem multiplied by 0.60;14            (E) for the quarter beginning July 1, 2023, the 15        sum of the RUG-IV nursing component per diem 16        multiplied by 0.20 and the PDPM nursing component per 17        diem multiplied by 0.80; or18            (F) for the quarter beginning October 1, 2023 and 19        each subsequent quarter, the transition rate shall end 20        and a nursing facility shall be paid 100% of the PDPM 21        nursing component per diem.22    (d-1) Calculation of base year Statewide RUG-IV nursing 23base per diem rate. 24        (1) Base rate spending pool shall be: 25            (A) The base year resident days which are 26        calculated by multiplying the number of Medicaid   HB1785- 9 -LRB104 09236 KTG 19293 b1        residents in each nursing home as indicated in the MDS 2        data defined in paragraph (4) by 365.3            (B) Each facility's nursing component per diem in 4        effect on July 1, 2012 shall be multiplied by 5        subsection (A).6            (C) Thirteen million is added to the product of 7        subparagraph (A) and subparagraph (B) to adjust for 8        the exclusion of nursing homes defined in paragraph 9        (5). 10        (2) For each nursing home with Medicaid residents as 11    indicated by the MDS data defined in paragraph (4), 12    weighted days adjusted for case mix and regional wage 13    adjustment shall be calculated. For each home this 14    calculation is the product of:15            (A) Base year resident days as calculated in 16        subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1).17            (B) The nursing home's regional wage adjustor 18        based on the Health Service Areas (HSA) groupings and 19        adjustors in effect on April 30, 2012.20            (C) Facility weighted case mix which is the number 21        of Medicaid residents as indicated by the MDS data 22        defined in paragraph (4) multiplied by the associated 23        case weight for the RUG-IV 48 grouper model using 24        standard RUG-IV procedures for index maximization.25            (D) The sum of the products calculated for each 26        nursing home in subparagraphs (A) through (C) above   HB1785- 10 -LRB104 09236 KTG 19293 b1        shall be the base year case mix, rate adjusted 2        weighted days.3        (3) The Statewide RUG-IV nursing base per diem rate:4            (A) on January 1, 2014 shall be the quotient of the 5        paragraph (1) divided by the sum calculated under 6        subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2);7            (B) on and after July 1, 2014 and until July 1, 8        2022, shall be the amount calculated under 9        subparagraph (A) of this paragraph (3) plus $1.76; and 10            (C) beginning July 1, 2022 and thereafter, $7 11        shall be added to the amount calculated under 12        subparagraph (B) of this paragraph (3) of this 13        Section. 14        (4) Minimum Data Set (MDS) comprehensive assessments 15    for Medicaid residents on the last day of the quarter used 16    to establish the base rate.17        (5) Nursing facilities designated as of July 1, 2012 18    by the Department as "Institutions for Mental Disease" 19    shall be excluded from all calculations under this 20    subsection. The data from these facilities shall not be 21    used in the computations described in paragraphs (1) 22    through (4) above to establish the base rate. 23    (e) Beginning July 1, 2014, the Department shall allocate 24funding in the amount up to $10,000,000 for per diem add-ons to 25the RUGS methodology for dates of service on and after July 1, 262014:  HB1785- 11 -LRB104 09236 KTG 19293 b1        (1) $0.63 for each resident who scores in I4200 2    Alzheimer's Disease or I4800 non-Alzheimer's Dementia.3        (2) $2.67 for each resident who scores either a "1" or 4    "2" in any items S1200A through S1200I and also scores in 5    RUG groups PA1, PA2, BA1, or BA2.6    (e-1) (Blank).7    (e-2) For dates of services beginning January 1, 2014 and 8ending September 30, 2023, the RUG-IV nursing component per 9diem for a nursing home shall be the product of the statewide 10RUG-IV nursing base per diem rate, the facility average case 11mix index, and the regional wage adjustor. For dates of 12service beginning July 1, 2022 and ending September 30, 2023, 13the Medicaid access adjustment described in subsection (e-3) 14shall be added to the product. 15    (e-3) A Medicaid Access Adjustment of $4 adjusted for the 16facility average PDPM case mix index calculated quarterly 17shall be added to the statewide PDPM nursing per diem for all 18facilities with annual Medicaid bed days of at least 70% of all 19occupied bed days adjusted quarterly. For each new calendar 20year and for the 6-month period beginning July 1, 2022, the 21percentage of a facility's occupied bed days comprised of 22Medicaid bed days shall be determined by the Department 23quarterly. For dates of service beginning January 1, 2023, the 24Medicaid Access Adjustment shall be increased to $4.75. This 25subsection shall be inoperative on and after January 1, 2028. 26    (e-4) Subject to federal approval, on and after January 1,   HB1785- 12 -LRB104 09236 KTG 19293 b12024, the Department shall increase the rate add-on at 2paragraph (7) subsection (a) under 89 Ill. Adm. Code 147.335 3for ventilator services from $208 per day to $481 per day. 4Payment is subject to the criteria and requirements under 89 5Ill. Adm. Code 147.335. 6    (f) (Blank).7    (g) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, on 8and after July 1, 2012, for facilities not designated by the 9Department of Healthcare and Family Services as "Institutions 10for Mental Disease", rates effective May 1, 2011 shall be 11adjusted as follows:12        (1) (Blank);13        (2) (Blank);14        (3) Facility rates for the capital and support 15    components shall be reduced by 1.7%.16    (h) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, on 17and after July 1, 2012, nursing facilities designated by the 18Department of Healthcare and Family Services as "Institutions 19for Mental Disease" and "Institutions for Mental Disease" that 20are facilities licensed under the Specialized Mental Health 21Rehabilitation Act of 2013 shall have the nursing, 22socio-developmental, capital, and support components of their 23reimbursement rate effective May 1, 2011 reduced in total by 242.7%.25    (i) On and after July 1, 2014, the reimbursement rates for 26the support component of the nursing facility rate for   HB1785- 13 -LRB104 09236 KTG 19293 b1facilities licensed under the Nursing Home Care Act as skilled 2or intermediate care facilities shall be the rate in effect on 3June 30, 2014 increased by 8.17%. 4    (i-1) Subject to federal approval, on and after January 1, 52024, the reimbursement rates for the support component of the 6nursing facility rate for facilities licensed under the 7Nursing Home Care Act as skilled or intermediate care 8facilities shall be the rate in effect on June 30, 2023 9increased by 12%. 10    (j) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, subject to 11federal approval, effective July 1, 2019, sufficient funds 12shall be allocated for changes to rates for facilities 13licensed under the Nursing Home Care Act as skilled nursing 14facilities or intermediate care facilities for dates of 15services on and after July 1, 2019: (i) to establish, through 16June 30, 2022 a per diem add-on to the direct care per diem 17rate not to exceed $70,000,000 annually in the aggregate 18taking into account federal matching funds for the purpose of 19addressing the facility's unique staffing needs, adjusted 20quarterly and distributed by a weighted formula based on 21Medicaid bed days on the last day of the second quarter 22preceding the quarter for which the rate is being adjusted. 23Beginning July 1, 2022, the annual $70,000,000 described in 24the preceding sentence shall be dedicated to the variable per 25diem add-on for staffing under paragraph (6) of subsection 26(d); and (ii) in an amount not to exceed $170,000,000 annually   HB1785- 14 -LRB104 09236 KTG 19293 b1in the aggregate taking into account federal matching funds to 2permit the support component of the nursing facility rate to 3be updated as follows:4        (1) 80%, or $136,000,000, of the funds shall be used 5    to update each facility's rate in effect on June 30, 2019 6    using the most recent cost reports on file, which have had 7    a limited review conducted by the Department of Healthcare 8    and Family Services and will not hold up enacting the rate 9    increase, with the Department of Healthcare and Family 10    Services. 11        (2) After completing the calculation in paragraph (1), 12    any facility whose rate is less than the rate in effect on 13    June 30, 2019 shall have its rate restored to the rate in 14    effect on June 30, 2019 from the 20% of the funds set 15    aside. 16        (3) The remainder of the 20%, or $34,000,000, shall be 17    used to increase each facility's rate by an equal 18    percentage. 19    (k) During the first quarter of State Fiscal Year 2020, 20the Department of Healthcare of Family Services must convene a 21technical advisory group consisting of members of all trade 22associations representing Illinois skilled nursing providers 23to discuss changes necessary with federal implementation of 24Medicare's Patient-Driven Payment Model. Implementation of 25Medicare's Patient-Driven Payment Model shall, by September 1, 262020, end the collection of the MDS data that is necessary to   HB1785- 15 -LRB104 09236 KTG 19293 b1maintain the current RUG-IV Medicaid payment methodology. The 2technical advisory group must consider a revised reimbursement 3methodology that takes into account transparency, 4accountability, actual staffing as reported under the 5federally required Payroll Based Journal system, changes to 6the minimum wage, adequacy in coverage of the cost of care, and 7a quality component that rewards quality improvements.8    (l) The Department shall establish per diem add-on 9payments to improve the quality of care delivered by 10facilities, including:11        (1) Incentive payments determined by facility 12    performance on specified quality measures in an initial 13    amount of $70,000,000. Nothing in this subsection shall be 14    construed to limit the quality of care payments in the 15    aggregate statewide to $70,000,000, and, if quality of 16    care has improved across nursing facilities, the 17    Department shall adjust those add-on payments accordingly. 18    The quality payment methodology described in this 19    subsection must be used for at least State Fiscal Year 20    2023. Beginning with the quarter starting July 1, 2023, 21    the Department may add, remove, or change quality metrics 22    and make associated changes to the quality payment 23    methodology as outlined in subparagraph (E). Facilities 24    designated by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid 25    Services as a special focus facility or a hospital-based 26    nursing home do not qualify for quality payments.  HB1785- 16 -LRB104 09236 KTG 19293 b1            (A) Each quality pool must be distributed by 2        assigning a quality weighted score for each nursing 3        home which is calculated by multiplying the nursing 4        home's quality base period Medicaid days by the 5        nursing home's star rating weight in that period.6            (B) Star rating weights are assigned based on the 7        nursing home's star rating for the LTS quality star 8        rating. As used in this subparagraph, "LTS quality 9        star rating" means the long-term stay quality rating 10        for each nursing facility, as assigned by the Centers 11        for Medicare and Medicaid Services under the Five-Star 12        Quality Rating System. The rating is a number ranging 13        from 0 (lowest) to 5 (highest).14                (i) Zero-star or one-star rating has a weight 15            of 0.16                (ii) Two-star rating has a weight of 0.75.17                (iii) Three-star rating has a weight of 1.5. 18                (iv) Four-star rating has a weight of 2.5.19                (v) Five-star rating has a weight of 3.5.20            (C) Each nursing home's quality weight score is 21        divided by the sum of all quality weight scores for 22        qualifying nursing homes to determine the proportion 23        of the quality pool to be paid to the nursing home. 24            (D) The quality pool is no less than $70,000,000 25        annually or $17,500,000 per quarter. The Department 26        shall publish on its website the estimated payments   HB1785- 17 -LRB104 09236 KTG 19293 b1        and the associated weights for each facility 45 days 2        prior to when the initial payments for the quarter are 3        to be paid. The Department shall assign each facility 4        the most recent and applicable quarter's STAR value 5        unless the facility notifies the Department within 15 6        days of an issue and the facility provides reasonable 7        evidence demonstrating its timely compliance with 8        federal data submission requirements for the quarter 9        of record. If such evidence cannot be provided to the 10        Department, the STAR rating assigned to the facility 11        shall be reduced by one from the prior quarter. 12            (E) The Department shall review quality metrics 13        used for payment of the quality pool and make 14        recommendations for any associated changes to the 15        methodology for distributing quality pool payments in 16        consultation with associations representing long-term 17        care providers, consumer advocates, organizations 18        representing workers of long-term care facilities, and 19        payors. The Department may establish, by rule, changes 20        to the methodology for distributing quality pool 21        payments. 22            (F) The Department shall disburse quality pool 23        payments from the Long-Term Care Provider Fund on a 24        monthly basis in amounts proportional to the total 25        quality pool payment determined for the quarter. 26            (G) The Department shall publish any changes in   HB1785- 18 -LRB104 09236 KTG 19293 b1        the methodology for distributing quality pool payments 2        prior to the beginning of the measurement period or 3        quality base period for any metric added to the 4        distribution's methodology. 5        (2) Payments based on CNA tenure, promotion, and CNA 6    training for the purpose of increasing CNA compensation. 7    It is the intent of this subsection that payments made in 8    accordance with this paragraph be directly incorporated 9    into increased compensation for CNAs. As used in this 10    paragraph, "CNA" means a certified nursing assistant as 11    that term is described in Section 3-206 of the Nursing 12    Home Care Act, Section 3-206 of the ID/DD Community Care 13    Act, and Section 3-206 of the MC/DD Act. The Department 14    shall establish, by rule, payments to nursing facilities 15    equal to Medicaid's share of the tenure wage increments 16    specified in this paragraph for all reported CNA employee 17    hours compensated according to a posted schedule 18    consisting of increments at least as large as those 19    specified in this paragraph. The increments are as 20    follows: an additional $1.50 per hour for CNAs with at 21    least one and less than 2 years' experience plus another 22    $1 per hour for each additional year of experience up to a 23    maximum of $6.50 for CNAs with at least 6 years of 24    experience. For purposes of this paragraph, Medicaid's 25    share shall be the ratio determined by paid Medicaid bed 26    days divided by total bed days for the applicable time   HB1785- 19 -LRB104 09236 KTG 19293 b1    period used in the calculation. In addition, and additive 2    to any tenure increments paid as specified in this 3    paragraph, the Department shall establish, by rule, 4    payments supporting Medicaid's share of the 5    promotion-based wage increments for CNA employee hours 6    compensated for that promotion with at least a $1.50 7    hourly increase. Medicaid's share shall be established as 8    it is for the tenure increments described in this 9    paragraph. Qualifying promotions shall be defined by the 10    Department in rules for an expected 10-15% subset of CNAs 11    assigned intermediate, specialized, or added roles such as 12    CNA trainers, CNA scheduling "captains", and CNA 13    specialists for resident conditions like dementia or 14    memory care or behavioral health.15    (m) The Department shall work with nursing facility 16industry representatives to design policies and procedures to 17permit facilities to address the integrity of data from 18federal reporting sites used by the Department in setting 19facility rates. 20(Source: P.A. 102-77, eff. 7-9-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 21102-1035, eff. 5-31-22; 102-1118, eff. 1-18-23; 103-102, 22Article 40, Section 40-5, eff. 1-1-24; 103-102, Article 50, 23Section 50-5, eff. 1-1-24; 103-593, eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 247-1-24.) 25    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 262025.